Alabama, session 2026rs, SB355.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
6 Section 1. The boundary lines and corporate limits of
7 the City of Valley in Chambers County are altered and
8 rearranged to include within the corporate limits of the
9 municipality, in addition to the lands now included, all of
10 the following territory:
11 Parcel 1: That certain tract or parcel of land with all
12 improvements thereon, located in the Southeast quarter of
13 Section 20, Township 21, Range 29, in Chambers County,
14 Alabama. This being all the property conveyed to Douglas
15 Slaton by Mrs. Nannie Wood by a certain deed recorded in Deed
16 Book 57, Page 226, of the records of Chambers County, Alabama,
17 except 25.5 acres thereof, which was conveyed by Douglas
18 Slaton and wife, Bertha Slaton, to Ann Estes Gordy by a
19 certain deed which is recorded in Deed Book 81, Page 76, of
20 the Records of Chambers County, Alabama. Said tract or parcel
21 of land being more particularly described as follows:
22 Beginning at a point on the Langdale - Riverview Road, thence
23 North 13 degrees West for 406 feet to a point for a corner;
24 thence in an easterly direction for 145 feet; thence in a
25 southerly direction along the margin for 143 feet to a point
26 for a corner; thence in an easterly direction for 184 feet to
27 a point for a corner; thence in a southerly direction for 334
28 feet to a point for a corner on the Langdale - Riverview Road,
Page 1

feet to a point for a corner on the Langdale - Riverview Road,
SB355 Enrolled
29 thence in a westerly direction along the northern margin of
30 the said Langdale - Riverview Road to the point of beginning.
31 All of the above described property being situated in Chambers
32 County, Alabama. This being the same property conveyed by deed
33 recorded in Deed Volume 127 at Page 602, records of Chambers
34 County, Alabama. This being the same property listed as Parcel
35 I conveyed in that certain deed recorded as Document 2004-4438
36 in the records of the Judge of Probate of Chambers County,
37 Alabama.
38 LESS AND EXCEPT From Parcel I: One (1) acre of land in
39 the South Half of Section 20, Township 21 North, Range 29
40 East, of Chambers County, Alabama, being more fully described
41 as follows, to-wit: Begin at the Southwest corner of Section
42 20, Township 21 North, Range 29 East, Chambers County,
43 Alabama, and run with a M.B. of North 85 degrees 21 minutes
44 East along the South margin of said section, for 3,423.2 feet
45 to a point; thence with a M.B. of North 03 degrees 49 minutes
46 West for 379.6 feet to an iron pin for a point; thence with a
47 M.B. of North 02 degrees 16 minutes West for 185.0 feet to an
48 iron pin for a point on the South margin of the road between
49 Langdale, Alabama, and Riverview, Alabama; thence with a M.B.
50 of North 16 degrees 57 minutes West across said road, for
51 324.7 feet to an iron pin for a corner and starting point of
52 the lot to be described; thence with a M.B. of South 79
53 degrees 04 minutes West for 377.7 feet to an iron pin for a
54 corner; thence with a M.B. of North 13 degrees 39 minutes West
55 for 199.2 feet to an iron pin for a corner; thence with a M.B.
56 of North 77 degrees 27 minutes East for 145.1 feet to an iron
Page 2

of North 77 degrees 27 minutes East for 145.1 feet to an iron
SB355 Enrolled
57 pin for a corner; thence with a M.B. of South 25 degrees 09
58 minutes East for 143.9 feet to an iron pin for a corner;
59 thence with a M.B. of North 78 degrees 43 minutes East for
60 184.4 feet to an iron pin for a corner; thence with a M.B. of
61 South 30 degrees 44 minutes East for 68.1 feet to an iron pin
62 for a corner and the starting point. The above described
63 property contains 1.0 acres, more or less, and is located in
64 the South Half of Section 20, Township 21 North, Range 29
65 East, Chambers County, Alabama. This being a portion of the
66 property conveyed in that certain deed recorded as Document
67 2010-4607 in the records of the Judge of Probate of Chambers
68 County, Alabama.
69 This property being further described as a parcel of
70 land containing 2.06 acres more or less, shown as Tax Parcel
71 Number 12-18-04-20-4-001-004.000, as shown on the Chambers
72 County, Alabama GIS.
73 Parcel 2: Commencing at the intersection of the East
74 and West Half Section Line of Section 20, Township 21, Range
75 29, Chambers County, Alabama and the East margin of the
76 Langdale-Riverview Public Road; thence Southeast along said
77 Public Road for 1746 feet, more or less, to an iron pin
78 located on the East margin of said Road for a starting point
79 and pin located in the center of a branch in front of a
80 culvert; thence Northeast along said branch North 30 degrees
81 15 minutes East for 325 feet to an iron pin; thence Southeast
82 South 18 degrees 20 minutes East for 440 feet, more or less,
83 to a pion on the East margin of said Langdale and Riverview
84 Public Road; thence Northwest along the East margin of said
Page 3

Public Road; thence Northwest along the East margin of said
SB355 Enrolled
85 road for 400 feet more or less to the point of beginning. This
86 property is located in the South half of Section 20, Township
87 21, Range 29, Chambers County, Alabama. This is the same
88 property described in Document 2008-2251.
89 ADDRESS: 7421 20th Avenue, Valley, Alabama
90 This property being further described as a parcel of
91 land shown as Tax Parcel Number 12-18-04-20-3-001-032.000, and
92 owned by Connery Booker, as shown on the Chambers County,
93 Alabama GIS.
94 Parcel 3: Commencing at the Southwest corner of Section
95 20, Township 21 North, Range 29 East, Chambers County,
96 Alabama; thence East for 1927.4 feet to a point; thence North
97 for 957.0 feet to a point on the Northeast margin of Chambers
98 County Highway Number 87 and the POINT OF BEGINNING; thence
99 North 50 degrees 21 minutes West along the margin of said
100 County Highway for a chord distance of 210.0 feet to a point
101 the center of a branch for a corner; thence along the center
102 of said branch with the following bearings and distances:
103 North 36 degrees 10 minutes East for 325.0 feet; North 35
104 degrees 37 minutes East for 75.0 feet; South 73 degrees 02
105 minutes East for 112.2 feet; North 63 degrees 38 minutes East
106 for 136.7 feet for a corner; thence South 14 degrees 38
107 minutes East for 210.0 feet for a corner; thence South 51
108 degrees 40 minutes West for 454.6 feet for a corner and the
109 Point of Beginning, located in the SW '7‹ of Section 20,
110 Township 21 North, Range 29 East, Chambers County, Alabama,
111 and contains 3.03 acres more or less. This is the same
112 property acquired by Beveridge Metal Products, Inc., by deed
Page 4

property acquired by Beveridge Metal Products, Inc., by deed
SB355 Enrolled
113 recorded in Deed Volume 293, Page 68. This is also the same
114 property acquired by Grantor by deed recorded at #2003-4076.
115 This property being further described as a parcel of
116 land shown as Tax Parcel Number 12-18-04-20-3-001-032.001, as
117 shown on the Chambers County, Alabama GIS.
118 Parcel 4: One Block of land in Section 19, Township 2
119 l, Range 29, situated on East margin of West Point-Columbus
120 Road as described in land deed and recorded on Page II 78,
121 Volume 64 as applies to East side of Columbus-West Point Road.
122 The above described property bounded as follows: On the North
123 by Grady Paschal. East by Grady Paschal and Johnny Myhand and
124 on the South by old Chattahoochee Valley Railroad and on the
125 West by black topped old Columbus Highway.
126 This being the same property conveyed by that certain
127 deed recorded at Document #2021-3325 in the Office of the
128 Judge of Probate of Chambers County, Alabama.
129 This property being further described as a parcel of
130 land shown as Tax Parcel Number 12-18-04-20-3-002-037.000, as
131 shown on the Chambers County, Alabama GIS.
132 Parcel 5: Commence at a point in the south or-half
133 (1/2) of Section 20, Township 21 North Range 29 East of
134 Chambers County, Alabama where the Easterly margin of the
135 right-of-way known as McGinty Street intersects the Southerly
136 margin of the right-of-way known as Riverview Road; thence run
137 North 87 degrees 41 minutes East along the Southerly margin of
138 said Riverview Road for a distance of 360.4 feet to a point;
139 which is the point of beginning of the real property to be
140 herein described and conveyed; from said point of beginning,
Page 5

herein described and conveyed; from said point of beginning,
SB355 Enrolled
141 thence run North 87 degrees 41 minutes East along the
142 Southerly margin of said Riverview Road for a distance of
143 100.0 feet to a point, which point is located on the Southerly
144 margin of said Riverview Road; thence run South l5 degrees l9
145 minutes West for a distance of 311.00 feet to a point; thence
146 run South 85 degrees 00 minutes West for a distance of 75.0
147 feet to a point; thence run North 15 degrees 19 minutes East
148 for a distance of 45.6 feet to a point; thence run North 09
149 degrees 51 minutes East for a distance of 262.3 feet to a
150 point which point is the said point of beginning. It is
151 further described as being the same real property surveyed and
152 planted by Grady A Fuller, Alabama Registered Surveyor
153 Certificate No. 3089, dated June 20, 1973.
154 This property being further described as a parcel of
155 land shown as Tax Parcel Number 12-18-04-20-4-001-019.000 as
156 shown on the Chambers County, Alabama GIS.
157 Parcel 6: All that tract of land lying and being in the
158 west half of Section 6, Township 21 North, Range 29 East and
159 the east half of Section 1, Township 21 North, Range 28 East,
160 Chambers County, Alabama containing 0.751 acres, more or less,
161 and being more particularly described as follows:
162 Begin at an iron pin being the Southeast corner of
163 Block 18 of the Village Property Map. Shawmut Mill Division,
164 West Point Manufacturing Company as recorded in Plat Book 3,
165 Pages 20-22, Chambers County records. Thence along the
166 Northeasterly right-of-way of 35 Place North 51°39'11" West a
167 distance of 102.24 feet to an iron pin, said iron pin being
168 the Point of Beginning of the property herein described;
Page 6

the Point of Beginning of the property herein described;
SB355 Enrolled
169 thence continue along said right-of-way North 5139'11" West
170 237.37 feet to an iron pin located on the easterly
171 right-of-way of 32nd Street; thence along said right-of-way
172 North 25°42'53" East 219.66 feet to a point; thence North
173 87°27'21" East 38.57' to a point; thence South 00°40'23" East
174 152.35 feet to a point; thence North 88°57'14" East 30.39 feet
175 to a point; thence South 00°37'54" East 9.91 feet to a point;
176 thence North 88°58'02" East 6.56 feet to a point; thence South
177 00°l9'11" East 26.68 feet to a point; thence North 88°57'51"
178 East 11.30 feet to a point; thence South 00°44'46" East 159.00
179 feet to the point of beginning.
180 The above described property being more fully shown as
181 Parcel C on a survey (the "Survey") prepared by Joe D. McElvy,
182 AL. L.S. No. 9686
183 Parcel 7: Begin at an iron pin being the Southeast
184 corner of Block 18 of the Village Property Map, Shawmut Mill
185 Division, West Point Manufacturing Company as recorded in Plat
186 Book 3, Page 20-22, Chambers County records, said point being
187 the point of beginning of the property herein described. FROM
188 THIS POINT OF BEGINNING, thence along the Northerly
189 right-of-way of 35th Place North 51° West a distance of 26.68
190 feet to a point; thence South 88°58'02" West a distance of
191 6.56 feet to an iron pin; thence North 00°37'54" West a
192 distance of 9.91 feet to an iron pin; thence South 88°57'14"
193 West a distance of 30.39 feet to an iron pin; thence North 00°
194 40'23" West a distance of 152.35 feet to an iron pin located
195 on the South line of Valley Telephone Company's property;
196 thence along said property line North 87°39'11" West a
Page 7

thence along said property line North 87°39'11" West a
SB355 Enrolled
197 distance of 102.24 feet to an iron pin; thence North 00°44'
198 46" West a distance of 159.00 feet to an iron pin; thence
199 South 88°57'51" West a distance of 11.30 feet to an iron pin;
200 thence North 00°19'11"27'21" East a distance of 115.95 feet to
201 an iron pin located on the Westerly right-of-way of 22nd
202 Avenue; thence along said right-of-way South 02°18'17" East a
203 distance of 415.91 feet to the point of beginning. The above
204 described property being more fully shown on a survey (the
205 "Survey") prepared by Joe D. McElvy, Al. L.S. No. 9686, a
206 reduced copy of which is attached to that certain deed
207 recorded in Deed Book 312, Page 299, in the Office of the
208 Judge of Probate of Chambers County, Alabama.
209 Parcel 8: Begin at the Northeast corner of the
210 Southwest Quarter of Section 11, Township 21 North, Range 28
211 East, Chambers County, Alabama; thence South 02 degrees 42
212 minutes 00 seconds East for 1405.60 feet to a point located on
213 the South margin of Burney Road; thence along said right of
214 way North 85 degrees 44 minutes 00 seconds West for 55.0 feet
215 to a point; said point being the Point of Beginning of the
216 property herein described; thence leaving said right of way
217 South 04 degrees 28 minutes 00 seconds East for 57.10 feet to
218 a point; thence South 03 degrees 09 minutes 00 seconds East
219 for 100 feet to a point, thence South 03 degrees 15 minutes 00
220 seconds East for 200.00 feet to a point; thence South 03
221 degrees 0 minutes 00 seconds East for 79.48 feet to a point
222 thence North 85 degrees 42 minutes West for 322.15 feet to a
223 point; thence South 49 degrees 48 minutes 00 seconds West for
224 700.00 feet to a point located on the curve of the
Page 8

700.00 feet to a point located on the curve of the
SB355 Enrolled
225 Northeasterly Right of Way of Fob James Drive; thence along
226 the curve of said right of way North 47 degrees 52 minutes 48
227 seconds West a chord distance of 166.51 feet to a point;
228 thence leaving said Right of Way North 49 degrees 48 minutes
229 00 seconds East for 600.00 feet to a point; thence North 40
230 degrees 12 minutes 00 seconds West for 469.46 feet to a point
231 located on the curve of the South Right of Way of Burney Road;
232 thence along the curve of said Right of Way North 83 degrees
233 43 minutes 12 seconds East a chord distance of 356.84 feet to
234 a concrete monument located at the P.C. of said curve; thence
235 continue along said Right of Way of Burney Road South 85
236 degrees 42 minutes 42 seconds East for 443. 83 feet to the
237 Point of Beginning, containing 8.899 acres in Section 11
238 Township 21 North, Range 28 East, Chambers County, Alabama as
239 shown by plat of survey by Joe D. McElvy, R.L.S., AL. Reg. No.
240 9686, dated March 13, 1997, entitled" Survey for Land
241 Partners, Inc.", a copy of which is recorded in the Plat
242 records of Chambers County, Alabama. This is the same property
243 described in Document 1997-22358 in the Office of the Judge of
244 Probate in Chambers County, Alabama.
245 Section 2. In accordance with Section 11-42-6 of the
246 Code of Alabama 1975, a map showing the proposed territory to
247 be altered, rearranged, and extended from the City of Valley
248 is on file and open to public inspection in the Office of the
249 Judge of Probate in Chambers County, Alabama.
250 Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
251 1, 2026.
Page 9

1, 2026.
SB355 Enrolled
252
253
254
255
256
257
258 ________________________________________________
259 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
260
261
262
263 ________________________________________________
264 Speaker of the House of Representatives
265
266
267 SB355
268 Senate 17-Mar-26
269 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
270 the Senate.
271
272 Patrick Harris,
273 Secretary.
274
275
276
277
278 House of Representatives
279 Passed: 31-Mar-26
280
281
282
283
284 By: Senator Price
Page 10